Hawaii statutes.
[§189-3.5] Catch report; shared
jurisdiction of fisheries. (a) Where there is a shared jurisdiction
between the state and federal government over a fishery, the department shall
adopt rules necessary to effectuate the federal requirements.

(b) Any information submitted to the
department by any person in compliance with any requirement under this section
shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed, except when required under
court order or pursuant to subpoena issued by the department of the attorney
general, or with the prior written consent of the person who submitted the
information, or under cooperative agreements with government agencies of the
United States for exchange and use of the information specifically to manage
marine life. The department, by rule, may establish procedures necessary to
preserve the confidentiality, except that the department may release or make
public any information in the aggregate or summary form which does not directly
or indirectly disclose the identity of any person who submits information.

(c) This section shall not apply to the
Papahanaumokuakea Marine National Monument. [L 2008, c 113, §2]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next